Utah statutes.
67-5b-107.   Immunity -- Limited liability.
(1)  Officers and employees performing services for two or more public
agencies pursuant to contracts executed under the provisions of this part are
considered to be officers and employees of the public agency employing their
services, even though performing those functions outside of the territorial
limits of any one of the contracting public agencies, and are considered to be
officers and employees of public agencies in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
(2)  The officers and employees of the center, while acting within the scope
of their authority, are not subject to any personal or civil liability
resulting from carrying out any of the purposes of a center under the
provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
(3)  A volunteer is considered a government employee in accordance with
Section 67-20-3 and entitled to immunity under the provisions of Title 63G,
Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.
(4)  A volunteer, other than one considered a government employee in
accordance with Section 67-20-3, may not incur any personal financial
liability for any tort claim or other action seeking damage for an injury
arising from any act or omission of the volunteer while providing services for
the nonprofit organization if:
(a)  the individual was acting in good faith and reasonably believed he was
acting within the scope of the individual's official functions and duties with
the center; and
(b)  the damage or injury was not caused by an intentional or knowing act by
the volunteer which constitutes illegal or wanton misconduct.
(5)  The center is not liable for the acts or omissions of its volunteers in
any circumstance where the acts of its volunteers are not as described in
Subsection (4) unless:
(a)  the center had, or reasonably should have had, reasonable notice of the
volunteer's unfitness to provide services to the center under circumstances
that make the center's use of the volunteer reckless or wanton in light of
that notice; or
(b)  a business employer would be liable under the laws of this state if the
act or omission were the act or omission of one of its employees.
